New Jersey, session 221, S3730.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  If a proprietary institution converts to a nonprofit corporation that is an educational and charitable corporation under the "New Jersey Nonprofit Corporation Act," P.L.1983, c.127 (N.J.S.15A:1-1 et seq.), the institution shall annually submit its Internal Revenue Service Form 990 to the Secretary of Higher Education for a period of five years following its incorporation as a nonprofit. b.  The secretary shall annually review the Form 990 to ensure that there exist no reportable incidents that constitute private inurement.   The secretary may, upon a finding of a reportable incident, recommend to the Secretary of State that the institutions certificate of incorporation be revoked. 2. This act shall take effect immediately.